lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4925 Y 1
SFX 4925 0 ීයයන් .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 ්නාට .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 ්නාම .
SFX 1480 Y 1
SFX 1480 0 ්නාහ .
SFX 4115 Y 1
SFX 4115 0 කැටි .
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 0 ිං .
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 0 දෝරු .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 ික .
SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 0 ිතයට .
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 0 ිට .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 ිණ .
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 0 ිත .
SFX 1163 Y 1
SFX 1163 0 ිද .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ින .
SFX 1855 Y 1
SFX 1855 0 ිඳ .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ිම .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 ිය .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 ිර .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 ිල .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 තනයේ .
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 0 ස්ථානයෙහි .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 ිව .
SFX 3103 Y 1
SFX 3103 0 ිස .
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 0 ඳුගේ .
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 0 ිතයි .
SFX 2765 Y 1
SFX 2765 0 ඩාව .
SFX 3773 Y 1
SFX 3773 0 මහේ .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 න්නේද .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 0 න්නේය .
SFX 4916 Y 1
SFX 4916 0 ීහුද .
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 0 යයකට .
SFX 1400 Y 1
SFX 1400 0 යකගේ .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 මහත් .
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 0 ්ගන්නා .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 වාදැයි .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 යයක් .
SFX 3715 Y 1
SFX 3715 0 යයකි .
SFX 3994 Y 1
SFX 3994 0 තාවනට .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 න්නේත් .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 ්නන්ට .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 සයක් .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 තාවන් .
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 0 තාපල් .
SFX 1255 Y 1
SFX 1255 0 තුන් .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 ාධිපති .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 ිවරු .
SFX 3144 Y 1
SFX 3144 0 ිපුර .
SFX 3952 Y 1
SFX 3952 0 දවීමට .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 ිකාවක .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 ්නැති .
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 0 ිකාවට .
SFX 1952 Y 1
SFX 1952 0 වූයේය .
SFX 4091 Y 1
SFX 4091 0 ගතහොත් .
SFX 2610 Y 1
SFX 2610 0 මාන්න .
SFX 2336 Y 1
SFX 2336 0 ිකාවේ .
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 0 වාදයෙන් .
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 0 වෙකුට .
SFX 1317 Y 1
SFX 1317 0 ුවන්ගේ .
SFX 4893 Y 1
SFX 4893 0 ුණයි .
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 0 ත්වයන් .
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 0 සිංහ .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 කන් .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 ණයට .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 ණයද .
SFX 3756 Y 1
SFX 3756 0 මීටර .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 ්නෙත් .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 ිච්ච .
SFX 2021 Y 1
SFX 2021 0 යෝද .
SFX 4181 Y 1
SFX 4181 0 ්සෙන් .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 යෝය .
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 0 ගිය .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 ණයි .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 ණයේ .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 ිකයන්ට .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 වෙමි .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 වෙමු .
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 0 කරගත .
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 0 තත් .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 ැසින් .
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 0 ෙනකු .
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 0 ්තිමත් .
SFX 3854 Y 1
SFX 3854 0 න්හට .
SFX 3438 Y 1
SFX 3438 0 ශයන් .
SFX 3245 Y 1
SFX 3245 0 ාශ්‍රිත .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 න්හි .
SFX 4126 Y 1
SFX 4126 0 කාරවරයෙකු .
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 0 ්මිකව .
SFX 4118 Y 1
SFX 4118 0 කාවන්ට .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 ොවත් .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 යන්හි .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 ්නෙම .
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 0 ස්ථාන .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 ාචාරය .
SFX 3082 Y 1
SFX 3082 0 ුණට .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 ුණද .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 ොට .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 0 ොඩ .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 0 ුණහ .
SFX 4608 Y 1
SFX 4608 0 ොර .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 ුණා .
SFX 374 Y 1
SFX 374 0 ුණි .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 ාවකට .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 ුණු .
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 0 ුණෙ .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 ුණේ .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 යෙක්ද .
SFX 2024 Y 1
SFX 2024 0 යෙක්ම .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 ොව .
SFX 4598 Y 1
SFX 4598 0 ොළ .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 ුල්ලා .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 ුල්ලේ .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 ත්‍ර .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 චාරයක් .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 බාහු .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 ාවක් .
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 0 ාවකි .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 මටයි .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 කරුවාට .
SFX 3024 Y 1
SFX 3024 0 ූවාට .
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 0 ුදායක .
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 0 ූවාය .
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 0 ්කරුවන්ගේ .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 වෙලා .
SFX 1530 Y 1
SFX 1530 0 ියේදී .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 ්දන .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 0 ්දර .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 ියාවන් .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 යාවක් .
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 0 ්දහ .
SFX 3099 Y 1
SFX 3099 0 ීගිය .
SFX 1010 Y 1
SFX 1010 0 ්දා .
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 0 ්දි .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 ්දී .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 ්දු .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 ්දේ .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 0 දීද .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 දීම .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 දීය .
SFX 2298 Y 1
SFX 2298 0 ිවිය .
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 0 තුරු .
SFX 3831 Y 1
SFX 3831 0 පළක් .
SFX 3946 Y 1
SFX 3946 0 දානයක් .
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 0 ාවලියක් .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 ුකරන .
SFX 3416 Y 1
SFX 3416 0 සයෙන් .
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 0 ීමෙනුත් .
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 0 කරුවන්ට .
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 0 මනක් .
SFX 3180 Y 1
SFX 3180 0 ිගත .
SFX 4146 Y 1
SFX 4146 0 කරුවන්ව .
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 0 ිගම .
SFX 3179 Y 1
SFX 3179 0 ිගල .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 වරුන්ට .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 ප්පු .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 ිගේ .
SFX 3586 Y 1
SFX 3586 0 ලොවට .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 භවය .
SFX 4069 Y 1
SFX 4069 0 ගුණය .
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 0 කරණ .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 කරන .
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 0 කරය .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 කරල .
SFX 4852 Y 1
SFX 4852 0 ුපිටියේ .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 යටත් .
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 0 නවානම් .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 කරු .
SFX 3688 Y 1
SFX 3688 0 යෙනුයි .
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 0 ල්ලත් .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 ගොඩ .
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 0 කුගේ .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 මක්ද .
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 ලීමට .
SFX 4242 Y 1
SFX 4242 0 ්වැටි .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 කාරයා .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 ්පත .
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 0 කාරයේ .
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 0 කාරයො .
SFX 1115 Y 1
SFX 1115 0 කාරයෝ .
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 0 ්පය .
SFX 4404 Y 1
SFX 4404 0 ්පල .
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 0 ්ශණ .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 ්‍යාවට .
SFX 3435 Y 1
SFX 3435 0 ශීලීත්වය .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 ලත් .
SFX 4326 Y 1
SFX 4326 0 ්‍යාවය .
SFX 1390 Y 1
SFX 1390 0 ලතා .
SFX 4396 Y 1
SFX 4396 0 ්ප් .
SFX 4403 Y 1
SFX 4403 0 ්පි .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 0 ්පු .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 ලීමේ .
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 0 දිගින් .
SFX 4325 Y 1
SFX 4325 0 ්‍යාවේ .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 න්ටත් .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 පත්හි .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 ම්බර .
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 0 වයන්ට .
SFX 1576 Y 1
SFX 1576 0 සෙයි .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 වරයාට .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 0 ණියත් .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 වරයාද .
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 0 ම්බා .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 ම්බි .
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 0 වරයාය .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 0 ූයේය .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 වරයාව .
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 0 ාරම් .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 ීමටයි .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 ්ලාභී .
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 0 ුම්කරුගේ .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 ල්ගේ .
SFX 3105 Y 1
SFX 3105 0 ිවූයේ .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 ාගැනීමට .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 ෙයිද .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 0 තොත් .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 යෙකුට .
SFX 4202 Y 1
SFX 4202 0 ්ෂන් .
SFX 1905 Y 1
SFX 1905 0 ාගාරයක .
SFX 1176 Y 1
SFX 1176 0 ාගාරයට .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 ්මෙන් .
SFX 2760 Y 1
SFX 2760 0 ණයේදී .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 ාගාරයේ .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 දුවට .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 කරණය .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 රුවයි .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 තින් .
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 0 ්ෆ් .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 කාරිත්වය .
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 0 ලාභීන් .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 0 ගන්වනු .
SFX 3990 Y 1
SFX 3990 0 තිවලට .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 0 ගයෙන් .
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 0 ාර්ථ .
SFX 4954 Y 1
SFX 4954 0 ීමක්ද .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 0 යවත් .
SFX 3472 Y 1
SFX 3472 0 වියන් .
SFX 1876 Y 1
SFX 1876 0 ැවී .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 ්යක්ෂමතාවය .
SFX 2349 Y 1
SFX 2349 0 ැවේ .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 0 තලාව .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 රියන් .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 සන් .
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 0 පතිවරයකු .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 වක්ද .
SFX 4566 Y 1
SFX 4566 0 ්කරනු .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 0 ාගන්ඩ .
SFX 2395 Y 1
SFX 2395 0 ාගන්න .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 වෙනුයි .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 වීමටද .
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 0 ුයි .
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 0 වෙනුයේ .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 ුයේ .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 කිය .
SFX 2960 Y 1
SFX 2960 0 ෝත්සව .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 ඥයාට .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 වාගැනීමට .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 වූවත් .
SFX 1810 Y 1
SFX 1810 0 ූත් .
SFX 2613 Y 1
SFX 2613 0 මානයන් .
