lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අත්/10,26,36,52,64,65,76,86,87,88,117,131,156,161,217,218,219,305,379,387,505,509,522,536,576,644,744,747,853,945,968,1185,1259,1405,1575,1584,1594,1709,1916,1958,2643,3346,3347,3348,3357,3365,3422,3476,3480,3484,3800,3996
අහන/35,44,159,215,1009,2907
ආබාධ/2,13,29,30,43,48,62,239,302,933,1551,2326,2327,3170
ආරක්ෂ/1431
කයි/2,244,531,632,639,2628,2765
ගිල/5,9,20,42,63,121,165,203,290,310,342,360,535,545,582,737,905,1467,2083,2116,4922,4982,4984,4985,4986
ජනජීව/14,3171
තෙද/128
දුක/1,4,5,6,7,11,18,23,28,32,121,152,214,754,1290,2171,2172,4549,4598
ධර්ම/13,15,19,21,47,53,62,70,128,137,146,226,321,377,451,470,551,561,635,729,808,944,1174,1390,1786,1887,2013,2480,2738,3436,3936,4109
නවම්/3773
නැඟ/3,16,20,24,42,51,56,59,69,80,83,102,113,121,140,208,211,220,230,241,262,263,264,272,280,310,316,326,545,662,705,748,912,913,1314,1328,1503,4705,4863,4914
පලස්තීන/2,15,21,24,226,621,762,1317,1511
පාල/8,13,16,17,24,33,50,51,65,71,75,78,105,196,302,333,372,376,398,430,437,453,463,483,487,508,605,609,614,625,741,753,916,965,999,1094,1095,1118,1246,1247,1274,1275,1276,1277,1278,1461,2042,2834,3101,3170,3191,4151,4154
පැතිර/3,16,42,59,60,76,88,102,121,140,143,203,208,211,220,230,263,280,310,316,375,449,456,1522,2236,2241,3091
පැන/1,2,5,13,16,18,19,43,44,46,47,51,56,59,63,64,69,76,80,87,88,113,125,126,131,143,145,159,187,209,218,247,272,273,344,393,417,422,456,465,535,580,581,696,721,785,825,1080,1209,1480,1627,2166,2200,2217,3217,3220,4412,4419,4521
පිටුපස/127,254,4181
පිරිස/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,11,12,14,16,17,22,23,32,40,49,99,110,116,150,152,214,229,401,1199,1325,1855,4168,4873
පුරා/297,1983,2127,2760,3512,4009
පුස්තකාලය/1039,3296
පොම්ප/2,13,629,3918
බැඳ/3,16,42,51,53,56,59,63,80,88,90,102,121,125,126,209,211,220,230,263,272,287,310,326,375,393,545,587,658,705,1112,2145,3012,3124,4086,4091
බිහිව/24,33,42,51,59,80,82,83,102,103,113,121,126,140,165,175,203,208,211,220,230,264,280,299,341,362,374,462,766,1141,1142,1146,3859
භක්තික/2020
මහත්ම/20,47,74,146,164,314,356,921,1333,4916
මිල/1,3,4,6,8,12,16,19,22,23,25,32,39,122,307,316,324,340,376,616,628,646,714,2220,3103,3130,4639,4654
මුදලි/1236,3852
මුළු/37,54,198,482,869,985,3576,3586,3774,3786
මූලධර්ම/2,27,170,320,380,1050,2486
යාව/16,19,33,83,1163,1721,4858
යැපෙන/35,44,68,159,618,1135
යොමුව/3,24,33,42,51,59,80,82,83,103,113,121,126,165,203,220,264,299,362,402,1142
රකින/24,44,55,68,187,827,1765,2201
රහස/3,4,5,18,23,110,118,127,153,325,1873,3180
ලැග/59,69,216,478
වංශ/2,13,15,19,38,39,128,451,479,2838
වදින/24,35,44,55,58,67,68,357,417,696
වන්න/1,3,4,5,9,16,20,23,31,41,42,49,51,72,79,114,115,118,138,169,174,179,184,201,279,301,420,481,649,1168,1306,1849,2333,3108,3603
වලා/63,125,4115
වැසි/27,29,30,62,69,74,81,97,136,141,158,164,195,200,239,356,501,603,708,731,920,1082,1329,1475,1514,1648,1833,2021,2036,2235,2274,3006
විචාර/2,11,13,17,19,27,33,38,113,123,128,281,297,372,437,487,508,614,685,716,753,1118,1278,2762
විස/3,16,18,20,24,59,80,83,121,127,168,237,254,262,276,343,376,454,484,578,587,654,839,842,924,976,977,1021,1031,1155,1338,1526,1779,1843,1857,2217,2335,2807,2817,2890,2929,3106,3122,3157,3181,3189,3193,3232,3850,3853,3931,4475,4505,4506,4635,4990
වේද/13,19,27,42,46,60,62,79,138,141,243,682,775,928,935,1030,2336,2337,3173,3183
ශාන්ත/1,16,51,3144
සමත්/2,8,10,52,64,76,87,88,131,145,177,189,218,444,446,465,782,783,1952,4159
සමූහ/2,13,15,19,38,47,1221,1400,1648
සහාය/1,4,7,64,76,333,372,437,484,487,508,614,791,935,1030,1461,2837,4141
සාර්ථක/12,64,86,182,338,468,980,1098,3202
සිදුවන/1965,2914
සිරි/451,551,561,639,727,744,747,788,862,1391,1405,1444,1633,1711,2539,2555,2610,3969,4103
සිලි/348,459,818,4580,4900
සිසු/9,35,41,61,72,89,91,238,256,304,388,1060,1585,2722,3472
සුන/24,187,190,224,229,510,588,624,1125,2944,3141,4965
සෙන්ටි/3756
ස්වදේශ/314,372,941,4925
ස්වර්ණ/20,101,421,3284,3826
හැට/3,4,5,9,16,17,19,22,42,51,169,179,285,288,416,946,1085,1159,1255,1667,2795,3131,4168,4529
හෙළ/16,20,22,24,33,42,51,59,80,82,83,92,103,113,114,144,206,207,240,241,257,262,494,654,839,885,924,1031,1155,1525,1526,1569,1842,1843,2297,2299,3105,3181,3182
